Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3111
School Emergency Response Mapping Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The School Emergency Response Mapping Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the State Department of Education and consist of any money transferred by the Legislature and any gifts, grants, or bequests. The department shall use the money in the fund for grants related to facilitating the implementation of mapping data in accordance with section 79-3110. Any funds available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars from the General Fund to the School Emergency Response Mapping Fund for fiscal year 2024-25 for the purpose of providing such grants.

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 89.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.